Montana, session 2025, HB486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 7-4-2508, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-4-2508. Compensation of undersheriff and deputy sheriff -- definitions. (1) The sheriff shall fix
the compensation of the undersheriff at 98% of the salary of that sheriff.
(2) (a) The sheriff shall fix the compensation of the deputy sheriff based upon on a percentage of
the salary of that sheriff according to the following schedule:
In counties with a population of:
Below 15,000 85% to 95% 97%
15,000 to 29,999 76% to 95% 97%
30,000 to 74,999 74% to 95% 97%
75,000 and over 72% to 95% 97%
(b) The sheriff shall adjust the compensation of the deputy sheriff within the range prescribed in
subsection (2)(a) according to a rank structure in the office.
(3) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Compensation" means the base rate of pay and does not mean longevity payments or
payments for hours worked overtime.
(b) "Salary of that sheriff" means the total salary provided for in 7-4-2503(1), (2)(b), and (2)(c)."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 486
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 486, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 486
INTRODUCED BY N. DURAM, S. NOVAK, M. CUFFE, D. LOGE, J. DARLING
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO COMPENSATION FOR DEPUTY SHERIFFS; INCREASING THE
PERCENTAGE OF THE SHERIFF'S SALARY THAT IS USED TO CALCULATE THE SALARY FOR DEPUTY
SHERIFFS; AND AMENDING SECTION 7-4-2508, MCA.